Hawaii statutes.
[PART
III. OTHER PROVISIONS]

[§196-41] State support for
achieving renewable portfolio standards. (a) The department of land and
natural resources and department of business, economic development, and tourism
shall facilitate the private sector's development of renewable energy projects
by supporting the private sector's attainment of the renewable portfolio
standards in section 269-92. Both departments shall provide meaningful support
in areas relevant to the mission and functions of each department as provided
in this section, as well as in other areas the directors of each department may
deem appropriate.

(b) The department of land and natural
resources shall:

(1) Develop and publish a catalog by December 31,
2006, and every five years thereafter, of potential sites for the development
of renewable energy; and

(2) Work with electric utility companies and with
other renewable energy developers on all applicable planning and permitting
processes to expedite the development of renewable energy resources.

(c) The department of business, economic
development, and tourism shall:

(1) Develop a program to maximize the use of
renewable energy and cost-effective conservation measures by state government
agencies;

(2) Work with federal agencies to develop as much
research, development and demonstration funding, and technical assistance as
possible to support Hawaii in its efforts to achieve its renewable portfolio
standards; and

(3) Biennially, beginning in January 2006, issue a
progress report to the governor and legislature. [L 2004, c 95, pt of §2]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to chapter 269, but is
renumbered to this chapter pursuant to §23G-15.

Cross References

Renewable portfolio standards, see §§269-91 to 269-96.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next